Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 14
CARRIERS OF HOUSEHOLD GOODS

40-14-101 to 40-14-114. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article repealed, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1984, repealed in 1995, and recreated and reenacted in 2003. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2011, consult the 2010 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning carriers of household goods, see article 10.1 of this title.